Texas, session 892, SB11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 8, Penal Code, is amended by adding Section 8.09 to read as follows: Sec. 8.09.  VICTIM OF TRAFFICKING OR COMPELLING PROSTITUTION. (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (b), it is an affirmative defense to prosecution that the actor: (1)  was a victim of an offense under Section 20A.02 or 43.05; and (2)  engaged in the conduct that is the subject of the prosecution as a direct result of being caused, through means of force, fraud, or coercion as described by Subsection (c), to engage in that specific conduct. (b)  Subsection (a) applies only if: (1)  the actor would not have engaged in the conduct that is the subject of the prosecution but for the use of force, fraud, or coercion; (2)  the use of force, fraud, or coercion would have compelled a reasonable person in the actor's circumstances to engage in the conduct; (3)  the actor was not merely afforded an opportunity to engage in the conduct without the use of force, fraud, or coercion; and (4)  the conduct does not constitute an offense listed in Article 42A.054(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, unless the actor is charged only as a party to that offense under Section 7.01. (c)  For purposes of this section, "force, fraud, or coercion" has the same meaning as in Section 20A.02. (d)  Information relevant to the identification of a defendant's status as a victim of an offense described by Subsection (a)(1) may be offered to establish an affirmative defense under this section. (e)  For purposes of this section, the actor is not required to prove that the person using force, fraud, or coercion to cause the actor to engage in the conduct that is the subject of the prosecution was charged with or convicted of an offense under Section 20A.02 or 43.05. SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to the prosecution of an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act. The prosecution of an offense committed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I hereby certify that S.B. No. 11 passed the Senate on August 18, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 30, Nays 0. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate I hereby certify that S.B. No. 11 passed the House on August 26, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 137, Nays 1, one present not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House Approved: ______________________________ Date ______________________________ Governor